Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.533

Medication synchronization policy required for health benefit plans covering prescription drugs—Requirements—Definitions.

(1) A health benefit plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter that is not subject to chapter 48.43 RCW, that is issued or renewed after December 31, 2015, and that provides coverage for prescription drugs must implement a medication synchronization policy for the dispensing of prescription drugs to the plan's enrollees.

(a) If an enrollee requests medication synchronization for a new prescription, the health [benefit] plan must permit filling the drug: (i) For less than a one-month supply of the drug if synchronization will require more than a fifteen-day supply of the drug; or (ii) for more than a one-month supply of the drug if synchronization will require a fifteen-day supply of the drug or less.

(b) The health benefit plan shall adjust the enrollee cost-sharing for a prescription drug subject to coinsurance that is dispensed for less than the standard refill amount for the purpose of synchronizing the medications.

(c) The health benefit plan shall adjust the enrollee cost-sharing for a prescription drug with a copayment that is dispensed for less than the standard refill amount for the purpose of synchronizing the medications by:

(i) Discounting the copayment rate by fifty percent;

(ii) Discounting the copayment rate based on fifteen-day increments; or

(iii) Any other method that meets the intent of this section and is approved by the office of the insurance commissioner.

(2) Upon request of an enrollee, the prescribing provider or pharmacist shall:

(a) Determine that filling or refilling the prescription is in the best interest of the enrollee, taking into account the appropriateness of synchronization for the drug being dispensed;

(b) Inform the enrollee that the prescription will be filled to less than the standard refill amount for the purpose of synchronizing his or her medications; and

(c) Deny synchronization on the grounds of threat to patient safety or suspected fraud or abuse.

(3) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Medication synchronization" means the coordination of medication refills for a patient taking two or more medications for a chronic condition such that the patient's medications are refilled on the same schedule for a given time period.

(b) "Prescription" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.64.011.

[ 2015 c 213 s 2.]